Utah statutes.
49-20-405.   Audit required -- Report to governor and Legislature.

The Insurance Department shall biennially audit the Public Employees' Trust Fund and programs authorized under this chapter and report its findings to the governor and the Legislature, but the commissioner may accept the annual audited statement of the programs under this chapter in lieu of the biennial audit requirement.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 250, 2002 General Session

